Missouri, session 2026, SB1495.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 140.100, RSMo, is repealed and one new
section enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as section 140.100,
to read as follows:
140.100. 1. (1) Each tract of land in the back tax
book, in addition to the amount of tax delinquent, shall be
charged with a penalty of eighteen percent of each year's
delinquency except that the penalty on lands redeemed prior
to sale shall not exceed two percent per month or fractional
part thereof.
(2) Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1)
of this subsection to the contrary, a collector may, at the
collector's discretion if good cause is shown, waive all or
part of the interest and penalties owed on delinquent taxes.
2. For making and recording the delinquent land lists,
the collector and the clerk shall receive ten cents per
tract or lot and the clerk shall receive five cents per
tract or lot for comparing and authenticating such list.
3. In all counties except counties having a charter
form of government before January 1, 2008, and any city not
within a county, in addition to the amount collected in

SB 1495 2
subsection 2 of this section, for making and recording the
delinquent land lists, the collector and the clerk shall
each receive five dollars per tract or lot. The ten dollars
shall be paid into the county employees' retirement fund
established pursuant to section 50.1010.
✓